Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10H-210] Reinstatement. In
addition to the requirements of sections 431:10H-208 and 431:10H-209, a
long-term care insurance policy or certificate shall include a provision that
provides for reinstatement of coverage, in the event of lapse if the insurer is
provided proof that the policyholder or certificate holder was cognitively
impaired or had a loss of functional capacity before the grace period contained
in the policy expired. This option shall be available to the insured if
requested within five months after termination and shall allow for the
collection of past due premium, where appropriate. The standard of proof of
cognitive impairment or loss of functional capacity shall not be more stringent
than the benefit eligibility criteria on cognitive impairment or the loss of
functional capacity contained in the policy and certificate. [L 1999, c 93, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next